District of Columbia statutes.
42-3210

Action in ejectment — When proper.

Whenever a lease for any definite term shall expire, or any tenancy shall be terminated by notice as aforesaid, and the tenant shall fail or refuse to surrender possession of the leased premises, the landlord may bring an action of ejectment to recover possession in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1382, ch. 854, § 1225
Feb. 17, 1909, 35 Stat. 623, ch. 134
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 991, ch. 646, § 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, §§ 155(c)(1)(J), 167(2)

History

Possessory actions, see § 16-1501 et seq.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 45-1410.
1973 Ed., § 45-910.

Prior Codifications